Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-427.04
Supervising pharmacy, defined.

Supervising pharmacy means a pharmacy licensed and located in Nebraska that owns and operates a licensed remote dispensing pharmacy.

Laws 2018, LB731, § 97.
July 19, 2018